Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Real Estate Appraisal Management Companies.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Sec. 08.87.130.
Registration required.

A person shall register as a real estate appraisal management company with the board to perform appraisal management services if the person

provides an appraisal management service

to a creditor or secondary mortgage market participant, including an affiliate; and

in connection with valuing a borrower’s principal dwelling as security for a consumer credit transaction or incorporating consumer credit transactions into a securitization; and

oversees an appraiser panel.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person engages in business as or holds out as a real estate appraisal management company, or performs or attempts to perform appraisal management services, at a time when the

person does not hold a registration issued by the board; or

registration issued by the board to the person is suspended, revoked, lapsed, or surrendered.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision limiting the authority of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and the Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers to enforce the registration requirement of this section, see sec. 8(b), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11,
ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.87.135.
Requirements for registration of real estate appraisal management companies.

The board shall register a real estate appraisal management company operating in the state if the company applies on a form approved by the board, pays the fee required under AS

08.01.065

, and presents evidence satisfactory to the board that the company

has designated a controlling person who will be the main point of contact between the board and the company and who meets the requirements under (b) of this section;

has, if the company is not a corporation that is domiciled in this state, filed with the department a written consent to service of process on a resident of this state for any court action arising from an activity regulated under this chapter or 12 U.S.C. 3331 — 3355 and provided the name and contact information for the company’s agent for service of process in this state;

requires a real estate appraiser to comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice adopted by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation when completing appraisals at the company’s request;

engages only appraisers who are certified under this chapter;

has a process to verify that a person who is assigned to serve on an appraiser panel of the company

is certified under this chapter and maintains a certification in good standing; and

is qualified to conduct federally related transactions under federal law; in this subparagraph, “federally related transaction” means a real estate related transaction that involves an insured depository institution regulated by the United States Comptroller of the Currency, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the National Credit Union Administration and requires the services of a real estate appraiser under the interagency appraisal rules;

conducts appraisals independently and free from inappropriate influence and coercion as required under 12 U.S.C. 3353;

is not directly or indirectly owned in whole or in part by a person that has had a certificate to act as a real estate appraiser denied, cancelled, suspended, revoked, put on probation, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation in any state unless the person has later had a certificate to act as a real estate appraiser granted or reinstated by the same state;

has posted a surety bond in an amount required by the board, not to exceed $50,000; and

is owned by persons who meet the requirements under (c) of this section.

A controlling person designated under (a) of this section

must be actively certified in a state as a real estate appraiser at all times that the person is designated as a controlling person;

may not have had a certificate to act as a real estate appraiser denied, cancelled, suspended, revoked, put on probation, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation in any state unless the person has later had the certificate to act as a real estate appraiser granted or reinstated; and

must be of good moral character.

A person who owns at least 10 percent of a real estate appraisal management company required to be registered under this chapter must be of good moral character as determined by the board and shall submit to a background investigation conducted by the board.

The board shall provide a copy of a registration under this section to the Appraisal Subcommittee established under 12 U.S.C. 3310 on a form approved by the subcommittee.

A registration under this section is valid for two years and may be renewed upon proof of continued compliance with the requirements under (a) — (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11,
ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.87.140.
Mandatory reporting.

A real estate appraisal management company or a controlling person, employee, director, officer, or agent of a real estate appraisal management company that has reasonable cause to believe that a real estate appraiser has failed to comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice as adopted under 12 U.S.C. 3339 in a manner that materially affects a valuation appraisal shall report the noncompliance to the board and to the Appraisal Subcommittee established under 12 U.S.C. 3310.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11, ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.87.145.
Statement of fees.

When reporting to a borrower, an appraisal management company shall separately state the fees

paid to an appraiser for the completion of an appraisal; and

charged to the borrower for appraisal management services by the appraisal management company.

An appraisal management company may not include any fees for appraisal services listed in (a)(1) of this section as charges for an appraisal management service listed in (a)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 08.87.142; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11, ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.87.150.
Retention of records and inspection.

A registered real estate appraisal management company or a real estate appraisal management company that has applied for registration shall allow the board to inspect and shall retain, for not less than the later of either five years after the date a file is submitted to the company or two years after final disposition of a related judicial proceeding,

copies of all records related to requests for the company’s appraisal management services and the real estate appraisers who perform the appraisals;

a written record of all substantive communications between a real estate appraisal management company registered under this chapter and a real estate appraiser relating to an appraisal or participation in an appraiser panel.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

08.87.145

; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11,
ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.87.155.
Reporting requirements for federally regulated real estate appraisal management companies.

A real estate appraisal management company that is owned and controlled by an insured depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813 and regulated by the United States Comptroller of the Currency, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, shall annually submit to the board information that the board is required to submit to the Appraisal Subcommittee established under 12 U.S.C. 3310, including a

report of intent to operate in the state; and

disclosure of whether the company is directly or indirectly owned in whole or in part by any person that has had a certificate to act as a real estate appraiser denied, cancelled, suspended, revoked, put on probation, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation in any state.

If a person has had disciplinary action taken against the person under (a)(2) of this section, the board shall collect information related to whether the certificate to act as a real estate appraiser was denied, cancelled, suspended, revoked, put on probation, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation for a substantive cause and whether the person has later had the certificate to act as a real estate appraiser reinstated by the same state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

08.87.150

; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11,
ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.87.160.
Exemptions.

AS

08.87.130

—

08.87.150

,

08.87.215

, and

08.87.220

do not apply to a

person who is employed by a department or division of an entity that provides appraisal management services only to that entity;

real estate appraisal management company that is

owned and controlled by an insured depository institution; and

regulated by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, the Federal Housing Finance Agency, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the United States Comptroller of the Currency, or the National Credit Union Administration; or

real estate appraiser who enters into an agreement with another real estate appraiser for the performance of an appraisal that upon completion results in a report signed by both the real estate appraiser who completed the appraisal and the real estate appraiser who requested completion of the appraisal.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

08.87.155

; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11,
ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.